Utah statutes.
49-11-102.    Definitions.
As used in this title:
(1) (a)  "Active member" means a member who is employed or who has been
employed by a participating employer within the previous 120 days.
(b)  "Active member" does not include retirees.
(2)  "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon
the basis of mortality tables as recommended by the actuary and adopted by the
executive director, including regular interest.
(3)  "Actuarial interest rate" means the interest rate as recommended by the
actuary and adopted by the board upon which the funding of system costs and
benefits are computed.
(4) (a)  "Agency" means:
(i)  a department, division, agency, office, authority, commission, board,
institution, or hospital of the state;
(ii)  a county, municipality, school district, local district, or special
service district;
(iii)  a state college or university; or
(iv)  any other participating employer.
(b)  "Agency" does not include an entity listed under Subsection (4)(a)(i)
that is a subdivision of another entity listed under Subsection (4)(a).
(5)  "Allowance" or "retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity,
including any cost of living or other authorized adjustments to the pension
and annuity.
(6)  "Alternate payee" means a member's former spouse or family member
eligible to receive payments under a Domestic Relations Order in compliance
with Section 49-11-612.
(7)  "Annuity" means monthly payments derived from member contributions.
(8)  "Appointive officer" means an employee appointed to a position for a
definite and fixed term of office by official and duly recorded action of a
participating employer whose appointed position is designated in the
participating employer's charter, creation document, or similar document, and
who earns during the first full month of the term of office $500 or more,
indexed as of January 1, 1990, as provided in Section 49-12-407.
(9) (a)  "At-will employee" means a person who is employed by a participating
employer and:
(i)  who is not entitled to merit or civil service protection and is generally
considered exempt from a participating employer's merit or career service
personnel systems;
(ii)  whose on-going employment status is entirely at the discretion of the
person's employer; or
(iii)  who may be terminated without cause by a designated supervisor,
manager, or director.
(b)  "At-will employee" does not include a career employee who has obtained a
reasonable expectation of continued employment based on inclusion in a
participating employer's merit system, civil service protection system, or
career service personnel systems, policies, or plans.
(10)  "Beneficiary" means any person entitled to receive a payment under this
title through a relationship with or designated by a member, participant,
covered individual, or alternate payee of a defined contribution plan.
(11)  "Board" means the Utah State Retirement Board established under Section
49-11-202.
(12)  "Board member" means a person serving on the Utah State Retirement Board
as established under Section 49-11-202.
(13)  "Contributions" means the total amount paid by the participating
employer and the member into a system or to the Utah Governors' and
Legislators' Retirement Plan under Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and
Legislators' Retirement Act.
(14)  "Council member" means a person serving on the Membership Council
established under Section 49-11-202.
(15)  "Covered individual" means any individual covered under Chapter 20,
Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program Act.
(16)  "Current service" means covered service as defined in Chapters 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, and 19.
(17)  "Defined benefit" or "defined benefit plan" or "defined benefit system"
means a system or plan offered under this title to provide a specified
allowance to a retiree or a retiree's spouse after retirement that is based on
a set formula involving one or more of the following factors:
(a)  years of service;
(b)  final average monthly salary; or
(c)  a retirement multiplier.
(18)  "Defined contribution" or "defined contribution plan" means any defined
contribution plan or deferred compensation plan authorized under the Internal
Revenue Code and administered by the board.
(19)  "Educational institution" means a political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state or a combination thereof primarily engaged in
educational activities or the administration or servicing of educational
activities, including:
(a)  the State Board of Education and its instrumentalities;
(b)  any institution of higher education and its branches;
(c)  any school district and its instrumentalities;
(d)  any vocational and technical school; and
(e)  any entity arising out of a consolidation agreement between entities
described under this Subsection (19).
(20) (a)  "Employer" means any department, educational institution, or
political subdivision of the state eligible to participate in a government-
sponsored retirement system under federal law.
(b)  "Employer” may also include an agency financed in whole or in part by
public funds.
(21)  "Exempt employee" means an employee working for a participating
employer:
(a)  who is not eligible for service credit under Section 49-12-203,
49-13-203, 49-14-203, 49-15-203, or 49-16-203; and
(b)  for whom a participating employer is not required to pay contributions or
nonelective contributions.
(22)  "Final average monthly salary" means the amount computed by dividing the
compensation received during the final average salary period under each system
by the number of months in the final average salary period.
(23)  "Fund” means any fund created under this title for the purpose of
paying benefits or costs of administering a system, plan, or program.
(24) (a)  "Inactive member" means a member who has not been employed by a
participating employer for a period of at least 120 days.
(b)  "Inactive member" does not include retirees.
(25) (a)  "Member" means a person, except a retiree, with contributions on
deposit with a system, the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan
under Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Act, or with a
terminated system.
(b)  "Member" also includes leased employees within the meaning of Section
414(n)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, if the employees have contributions on
deposit with the office.  If leased employees constitute less than 20% of the
participating employer's work force that is not highly compensated within the
meaning of Section 414(n)(5)(c)(ii), Internal Revenue Code, "member" does not
include leased employees covered by a plan described in Section 414(n)(5) of
the federal Internal Revenue Code.
(26)  "Member contributions" means the sum of the contributions paid to a
system or the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan, including
refund interest if allowed by a system, and which are made by:
(a)  the member; and
(b)  the participating employer on the member's behalf under Section 414(h) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(27)  "Nonelective contribution" means an amount contributed by a
participating employer into a participant's defined contribution account.
(28)  "Office" means the Utah State Retirement Office.
(29)  "Participant" means an individual with voluntary deferrals or
nonelective contributions on deposit with the defined contribution plans
administered under this title.
(30)  "Participating employer" means a participating employer, as defined by
Chapters 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, and 18, or an agency financed in whole or in
part by public funds which is participating in a system or plan as of January
1, 2002.
(31)  "Pension" means monthly payments derived from participating employer
contributions.
(32)  "Plan" means the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan
created by Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Act, or the
defined contribution plans created under Section 49-11-801.
(33) (a)  "Political subdivision" means any local government entity, including
cities, towns, counties, and school districts, but only if the subdivision is
a juristic entity that is legally separate and distinct from the state and
only if its employees are not by virtue of their relationship to the entity
employees of the state.
(b)  "Political subdivision" includes local districts, special service
districts, or authorities created by the Legislature or by local governments,
including the office.
(c)  "Political subdivision" does not include a project entity created under
Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, that was formed prior to
July 1, 1987.
(34)  "Program" means the Public Employees' Insurance Program created under
Chapter 20, Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program Act, or the Public
Employees' Long-Term Disability program created under Chapter 21, Public
Employees' Long-Term Disability Act.
(35)  "Public funds" means those funds derived, either directly or indirectly,
from public taxes or public revenue, dues or contributions paid or donated by
the membership of the organization, used to finance an activity whose
objective is to improve, on a nonprofit basis, the governmental, educational,
and social programs and systems of the state or its political subdivisions.
(36)  "Qualified defined contribution plan" means a defined contribution plan
that meets the requirements of Section 401(k) or Section 403(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(37)  "Refund interest" means the amount accrued on member contributions at a
rate adopted by the board.
(38)  "Retiree" means an individual who has qualified for an allowance under
this title.
(39)  "Retirement" means the status of an individual who has become eligible,
applies for, and is entitled to receive an allowance under this title.
(40)  "Retirement date" means the date selected by the member on which the
member's retirement becomes effective with the office.
(41)  "Service credit" means:
(a)  the period during which an employee is employed and compensated by a
participating employer and meets the eligibility requirements for membership
in a system or the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan, provided
that any required contributions are paid to the office; and
(b)  periods of time otherwise purchasable under this title.
(42)  "System" means the individual retirement systems created by Chapter 12,
Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act, Chapter 13, Public Employees'
Noncontributory Retirement Act, Chapter 14, Public Safety Contributory
Retirement Act, Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act,
Chapter 16, Firefighters' Retirement Act, Chapter 17, Judges' Contributory
Retirement Act, Chapter 18, Judges' Noncontributory Retirement Act, and
Chapter 19, Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Act.
(43)  "Voluntary deferrals" means an amount contributed by a participant into
that participant's defined contribution account.
